Utah statutes.
53-6-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Addiction" means the unlawful or habitual use of alcohol or a controlled
substance which endangers public health and safety.
(2)  "Certified academy" means a peace officer training institution certified
in accordance with the standards developed under Section 53-6-105.
(3)  "Council" means the Peace Officer Standards and Training Council created
in Section 53-6-106.
(4)  "Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt regarding criminal conduct,
including:
(a)  a finding of guilt by a court or a jury;
(b)  a guilty plea;
(c)  a plea of nolo contendere;
(d)  a plea which is held in abeyance pending the successful completion of:
(i)  a probationary period; or
(ii)  a diversion agreement; or
(e)  a conviction which has been expunged or dismissed.
(5)  "Director" means the director of the Peace Officer Standards and Training
Division appointed under Section 53-6-104.
(6)  "Dispatcher" means an employee of a public safety agency of the state or
any of its political subdivisions and whose primary duties are to:
(a) (i)  receive calls for one or a combination of, emergency police, fire,
and medical services, and to dispatch the appropriate personnel and equipment
in response to the calls; and
(ii)  in response to emergency calls, make urgent decisions affecting the
life, health, and welfare of the public and public safety employees; or
(b)  supervise dispatchers or direct a dispatch communication center.
(7)  "Division" means the Peace Officer Standards and Training Division
created in Section 53-6-103.
(8)  "POST" means the division.
